Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1445
Defendant may appear and answer.

On or before the day fixed for his appearance, the defendant may appear and answer and assert any legal or equitable defense, setoff, or counterclaim.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 45.